Arkansas, session 2025, HB1054.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 77, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
20-77-154. Blood pressure monitors for pregnant and postpartum women.
(a) The Arkansas Medicaid Program shall provide blood pressure
monitors for each pregnant woman and postpartum woman for up to one (1) year
after birth that are covered by the program.
(b) The Department of Human Services shall apply for any federal
waiver, Medicaid state plan amendments, or other authority necessary to
implement this section.

/s/Pilkington





*JMB002*
01-16-2025 13:01:39 JMB002